Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
ADMINISTRATION

31-31-201. Association - creation - board - organization - tax exemption.

There is hereby created an independent public body corporate and politic to be known as the fire and police pension association. The association is constituted as a public instrumentality, and its exercise of the powers conferred by this article and article 30.5 of this title shall be deemed to be the performance of an essential public function. The association shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state and shall not be an agency of state government and shall not be subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, or agency of the state.

(1.5) The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the fire and police pension association is a political subdivision of the state and that property owned, used, and occupied by the association is intended to be exempt from property tax as property of the state under section 4 of article X of the state constitution. Accordingly, for property tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2007, all real property owned, used, and occupied by the association and personal property owned and used by the association shall be exempt from the levy and collection of property tax.

The governing body of the association shall be a board of directors consisting of nine members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate as follows:

Two members who shall represent Colorado municipal employers;

One member who shall represent full-time paid firefighters;

One member who shall represent full-time paid police officers;

One member who shall be a retired firefighter who, upon completion of the member's term, shall be replaced by a retired police officer. Thereafter, the appointments of retired officers shall alternate between a retired firefighter and a retired police officer for each successive six-year term.

One member of a board of directors of a special district or the full-time paid professional manager of a special district who shall represent special districts having volunteer firefighters;

One member from the state's financial or business community with experience in investments;

One member from the state's financial or business community with experience in insurance disability claims; and

One member of the state's financial or business community experienced in personnel or corporate administration in corporations of over two hundred employees.

Members shall be appointed for terms of four years; except that a member appointed pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall serve for a term of six years.

Vacancy in any position shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment was made. Appointments may be made without confirmation of the senate when the senate is not in session, but such appointments shall be confirmed within thirty days of the next meeting of the senate in regular session or they shall be void.

The governor may remove any member of the board for cause.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for any necessary expenditures and shall suffer no loss of salary or wages through service on such board.

The board shall elect a chair and a vice-chair, shall appoint an executive director and such other employees as may be necessary, and shall fix the compensation for the appointees. The board shall have the authority to retain actuaries, investment counselors, private legal counsel, and other consultants as deemed necessary. The fees of such persons shall be considered expenses of the association.

Neither the members of the board nor any person authorized by the board to act in an official capacity shall be held personally liable for any act undertaken pursuant to the provisions of this article and article 30.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 894, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2007:

(1.5) added, p. 1541, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2010:

(2)(a)(IV) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 10-1016), ch. 72, p. 245, § 1, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1004.

31-31-202. Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall:

Establish standards for determining the actuarial soundness of:

The pension plans in the defined benefit system and the affiliated old hire plans and the affiliated exempt plans with assets in the fire and police members' benefit investment fund, in accordance with section 31-31-301 (1); and

Alternative pension plans having defined benefits in whole or in part established pursuant to section 31-31-601 (1). Based upon such standards, the board shall require biennial actuarial reviews of such plans with the cost of the reviews to be paid by employers having established such plans.

Establish standards for benefit projections for money purchase plans;

Establish criteria for the determination of disability to administer the provisions of section 31-31-803;

Promulgate rules relating to standards for disclosure of all ramifications of and procedures for obtaining the member approval provided for in section 31-31-601 (1);

Administer or provide for the administration and, in accordance with the provisions of sections 31-31-302 (1) and 31-31-303, the investment of the fire and police members' benefit investment fund and the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund;

Repealed.

Review or initiate proposed legislation affecting or related to the provisions of this article and article 30.5 of this title;

Provide for disbursements from the fire and police members' benefit investment fund created by section 31-31-301 (1) and from the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund created by section 31-31-301 (4). Such disbursements shall be made only for payment of the expenses of the association, payment of refunds to members, payment of survivor, disability, or retirement benefits, or for purposes of investment.

Make such modifications to the minimum annual rates of contribution certified to municipalities, fire protection districts, and county improvement districts as may be justified by actuarial studies approved by the board, subject to the requirements of section 31-30.5-304. In addition, the board shall supervise the establishment of such minimum annual rates of contribution for any nonexempt municipalities, fire protection districts, or county improvement districts that, for any reason, did not receive such minimum annual rate of contribution. Such establishment and modification of minimum annual rates of contribution shall be conducted substantially in the manner provided by procedural regulations promulgated by the board.

Promulgate such rules as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this article and article 30.5 of this title;

Approve or deny applications for coverage under the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to section 31-31-501.

The board has the sole power to determine eligibility for retirement for disability, whether total or occupational, for any police officer or firefighter in this state whether or not such member is covered by the provisions of this article, except for the following:

Those police officers and firefighters having social security coverage and not affiliated as to disability; and

Those police officers and firefighters whose employers have established exempt alternative pension plans, including exempt alternative defined benefit plans that are administered on an actuarially sound basis, based upon assumptions and methodology adopted by the board for statewide use, on or before December 1, 1978, in accordance with the provisions of part 8 of article 30.5 of this title, unless such plans have elected to become covered under the statewide death and disability plan pursuant to section 31-31-802 (1).

Except as provided in this subsection (2), the final power to determine disability status is vested in the board, but each employer shall determine whether positions are available for disabled members and shall make such appointments to such positions as it deems necessary.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Under the direction of the board, each employer, including employers not covered by or specifically exempted from the statewide defined benefit plan in accordance with the provisions of section 31-31-401 (1), shall furnish such information and shall keep such records as the board may require for the discharge of its duties.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Under the direction of the board, each employer, including employers not covered by or specifically exempted from the statewide retirement plan in accordance with the provisions of section 31-31-401 (1), shall furnish such information and shall keep such records as the board may require for the discharge of its duties.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (4), the board shall provide for and determine the cost of a statewide accidental death and disability insurance policy to cover all volunteer firefighters serving in volunteer or paid and volunteer fire departments, the insurance to be applicable only when serving as a volunteer firefighter. The policy shall be paid for as provided in section 31-30-1112 (2)(h)(II) from proceeds of the tax imposed by section 10-3-209, C.R.S.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (4), the board shall set the amount of coverage to be provided for each volunteer firefighter, take competitive bids for the policy from insurers, and make such rules as may be necessary to provide for the policy.

The insurer shall have sole power to determine disability for volunteer firefighters under the policy provided by this subsection (4).

On and after July 1, 2004, the responsibility to provide a statewide accidental death and disability insurance policy to cover all volunteer firefighters serving in volunteer or paid and volunteer fire departments shall be the responsibility of the department of local affairs pursuant to section 31-30-1134.

The board, in the performance of its duties under this article, shall have the power of subpoena over persons, and books, papers, records, and other things, and such power shall be enforceable by the courts; except that no subpoena shall be issued until the subpoena has been approved by a vote of the board.

The chair of the board, or any other member of the board designated by the chair, shall have the power to administer oaths, in the performance of the duties of the board under this article.

(5.5) The board may release the names and addresses of retirees of a plan affiliated with the fire and police pension association pursuant to part 7 of this article to the local pension board of the affiliated plan if:

The local pension board has filed a written request in the manner prescribed by the association; and

The local pension board has provided the board with written assurances that the information requested will be used only for pension-related purposes.

The board shall have such other powers and duties as are specifically granted pursuant to this article and parts 1 to 7 of article 30.5 of this title.

The board may promulgate rules for the assessment of interest, including the waiver of interest for good cause, on unpaid contributions to statewide plans. Interest shall accrue at the rate of one-half of one percent per month.

The board may assess the reasonable actuarial, audit, and operational costs incurred by the association related to compliance with regulatory requirements which are attributable to employers with members participating in plans administered by the association. Alternatively, the board may find such costs to be de minimis and pay the costs from the plan assets.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 896, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 827, § 44, effective August 5.

L. 2001:

(5.5) added, p. 416, § 2, effective June 1; (1)(f) repealed, p. 1276, § 41, effective June 5.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 1137, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(e), and (1)(h) amended, p. 182, § 8, effective March 31.

L. 2015:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 964, § 82, effective August 5; (7) and (8) added, (SB 15-027), ch. 9, p. 20, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 301, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1005 (1) to (5).

31-31-203. Fund not subject to levy.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2023.

]

Except for assignments for child support debt pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S., child support arrearages as requested as part of an enforcement action under article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., or child support arrearages that are the subject of enforcement services provided under section 26-13-106, C.R.S., for income assignments for child support purposes pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S., for writs of garnishment that are the result of a judgment taken for arrearages for child support or for child support debt, for payments made in compliance with a properly executed court order approving a written agreement entered into pursuant to section 14-10-113 (6), C.R.S., and for restitution that is required to be paid for the theft, embezzlement, misappropriation, or wrongful conversion of public property or in the event of a judgment for a willful and intentional violation of fiduciary duties pursuant to this article where the offender or a related party received direct financial gain, no portion of the funds created pursuant to sections 31-31-204 (4), 31-31-502, 31-31-701 (6), 31-31-706 (1), 31-31-813 (1), and 31-31-901 (3), before or after their order for distribution by the board to the persons entitled thereto, shall be held, seized, taken, subjected to, detained, or levied on by virtue of any attachment, execution, injunction, writ, interlocutory or other order or decree, or process or proceeding whatsoever issued out of or by any court of this state for the payment or satisfaction, in whole or in part, of any debt, damage, claim, demand, or judgment against the fire and police pension association or employers that belong to such association or the beneficiary of such funds. The funds shall be held and distributed for the purpose of this article and for no other purpose whatsoever.

31-31-203. Fund not subject to levy.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Except for assignments for child support debt pursuant to section 14-14-104, child support arrearages as requested as part of an enforcement action under article 5 of title 14, or child support arrearages that are the subject of enforcement services provided under section 26-13-106, for income assignments for child support purposes pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, for writs of garnishment that are the result of a judgment taken for arrearages for child support or for child support debt, for payments made in compliance with a properly executed court order approving a written agreement entered into pursuant to section 14-10-113 (6), and for restitution that is required to be paid for the theft, embezzlement, misappropriation, or wrongful conversion of public property or in the event of a judgment for a willful and intentional violation of fiduciary duties pursuant to this article 31 where the offender or a related party received direct financial gain, or as otherwise required under federal law, no portion of the funds created pursuant to this article 31 or article 31.5 of this title 31 before or after their order for distribution by the board to the persons entitled thereto, shall be held, seized, taken, subjected to, detained, or levied on by virtue of any attachment, execution, injunction, writ, interlocutory or other order or decree, or process or proceeding whatsoever issued out of or by any court of this state for the payment or satisfaction, in whole or in part, of any debt, damage, claim, demand, or judgment against the fire and police pension association or employers that belong to such association or the beneficiary of such funds. The funds shall be held and distributed for the purpose of this article 31 and for no other purpose whatsoever.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 898, § 1, effective May 23; entire section amended, p. 627, § 46, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1464, § 14, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 76, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 183, § 9, effective March 31.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-024), ch. 20, p. 90, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 301, § 3, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 96-002 and Senate Bill 96-204 were harmonized.

31-31-204. Defined benefit system - repeal.

There shall be a defined benefit system that shall consist of the following plans:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The statewide defined benefit plan established pursuant to part 4 of this article;

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The statewide retirement plan established pursuant to article 31.5 of this title 31;

The statewide hybrid plan established pursuant to part 11 of this article;

This subsection (1)(b) is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Any exempt plan that is incorporated into the defined benefit system, pursuant to an agreement established under section 31-31-706 (2);

Any health-care benefit plan established in association with the included plans; and

Any other plan authorized to be incorporated into the statewide defined benefit system.

The board may create plan documents for the plans within the defined benefit system that shall be in substantial conformance with the statutory provisions for each plan and that may include modifications and plan amendments as authorized under law.

(2.5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2.5) is effective until January 1, 2023.

]

Notwithstanding section 31-31-408 or 31-31-1102 (5) or the terms of an agreement entered into pursuant to section 31-31-706 (2), the board may modify or amend the plan provisions contained in part 4 of this article or a plan document or rules of a plan within the defined benefit system as the board deems prudent and necessary to administer benefits under the plan consistently and uniformly across the defined benefit system in a manner that does not result in an actuarial cost to the plan. Such modifications or amendments may include changes to the options for the distribution of benefits. This subsection (2.5) shall not be construed to authorize modification to the amount of a normal benefit.

(2.5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2.5) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Notwithstanding section 31-31.5-601 or the terms of an agreement entered into pursuant to section 31-31-706 (2), the board may modify, alter, or amend the plan provisions contained in article 31.5 of this title 31 or a plan document or rules of a plan within the defined benefit system as the board deems prudent and necessary to administer benefits under the plan consistently and uniformly across the defined benefit system in a manner that does not result in an actuarial cost to the plan. Such modifications or amendments may include changes to the options for the distribution of benefits. This subsection (2.5) shall not be construed to authorize modification to the amount of a normal benefit.

Qualification requirements - internal revenue code - definitions.

As used in this subsection (3), "internal revenue code" means the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The defined benefit system and each of the plans established by part 2, 4, 7, or 11 of this article included within the system shall satisfy the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the internal revenue code, as applicable to governmental plans.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The defined benefit system and each of the plans established by part 2 or 7 of this article 31 or part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31 included within the system shall satisfy the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the internal revenue code, as applicable to governmental plans.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(c) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The board may adopt any provision for a plan established by part 2, 4, 7, or 11 of this article that is necessary to comply with the internal revenue code.

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(c) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The board may adopt any provision for a plan established by part 2 or 7 of this article 31 or part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31 that is necessary to comply with the internal revenue code.

Trust fund.

There is hereby created the defined benefit system trust fund. All assets held in connection with the defined benefit system, including all contributions to the plans in the system, all property and rights acquired or purchased with such amounts, and all income attributable to such amounts, property, or rights, shall be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of members and their designated beneficiaries under the plans. Such assets shall constitute the trust fund. No part of the assets and income of the trust fund shall be used for, or diverted to, purposes other than for the exclusive benefit of members and their designated beneficiaries and for defraying reasonable expenses of the system.

All amounts of compensation contributed pursuant to the plans, all property and rights acquired or purchased with such amounts, and all income attributable to such amounts, property, or rights held as part of the defined benefit system, including member contributions, employer contributions, any state contributions, fees collected, gifts received, unclaimed deposits, and investment income, shall be transferred to the board to be held, managed, invested, and distributed as part of the trust fund in accordance with the provisions of the documents governing the system. All contributions to the plans shall be transferred by the employers to the trust fund. All benefits under the plans shall be distributed solely from the trust fund pursuant to the documents governing the system.

The board is the trustee of the defined benefit system trust fund.

The following accounts shall be established within the trust fund:

A new hire benefits account for the statewide defined benefit plan, into which contributions shall be deposited. The benefits provided by the statewide defined benefit plan shall be paid from such account.

Accounts for the statewide hybrid plan as may be required under the statewide hybrid plan document;

Accounts for exempt plans incorporated into the statewide defined benefit plan as may be required under the plan documents; and

Accounts for health-care benefit plans as may be required under the health- care plan documents.

This subsection (4)(d) is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 183, § 10, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1030), ch. 16, p. 90, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(2.5) added, (HB 12-1031), ch. 68, p. 236, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1)(a), (2.5), (3)(b), and (3)(c) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 301, § 4, effective January 1, 2023; (1)(b)(II) and (4)(d)(V) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, pp. 301, 312, §§ 4, 22.

31-31-205. Confidentiality of members' protected personal information.

All information contained in records of active members, retired members, former members, inactive members, designated beneficiaries, alternate payees, benefit recipients, and their dependents of any plan administered by the association or of any locally administered and financed alternative plan shall be maintained as confidential. The association or local plan administrator may provide such information as is necessary to a third-party service provider pursuant to article 73 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 302, § 5, effective August 10.